Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,119
Disposition of complaint; claimant; acceptance.

If the claimant under section 79-2,118 elects to accept the written disposition of the complaint made by the governing board under such section, he or she shall notify such board in writing of his or her acceptance within sixty days after receipt of such disposition, at which time such disposition shall be deemed final and conclusive. A failure to notify the board of such acceptance within the time period provided in this section shall be deemed a rejection of such disposition.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3006;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 123.